Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-194
University of Nebraska at Omaha; laws applicable.

Chapter 85, articles 1, 4, and 5, relating to the Board of Regents and the University of Nebraska shall be applicable to the University of Nebraska at Omaha except as modified or limited by section 85-192.

Laws 1967, c. 620, § 13, p. 2082;

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 53;

Laws 1988, LB 802, § 40;

Laws 2003, LB 68, § 8.